Washington statutes.
RCW 33.40.020

Director may take possession of domestic association on notice for delinquency.

Whenever it appears to the director that any domestic association is in an unsound condition or is conducting its business in an unsafe manner or is refusing to submit its books, papers, or concerns to lawful inspection, or that any director or officer thereof refuses to submit to examination on oath touching its concerns and affairs or that it has failed to carry out any authorized order or direction of the director, the director may give notice to the association so offending or delinquent or whose director or officer is thus offending or delinquent to correct such offense or delinquency and, if such association or such director or officer fails to correct the condition, offense, or delinquency within a reasonable time, as determined by the director, the director may take possession of the association.

[ 1994 c 92 s 455; 1982 c 3 s 66; 1945 c 235 s 103; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-222. Prior: 1933 c 183 ss 68, 71.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.